Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1917
Installation; repair; who can perform.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity who installs or repairs any sanitary plumbing within the state shall be a duly qualified master plumber licensed by the city or village nearest the construction site. The employees of the master plumbers who perform the actual installation or repair of sanitary plumbing shall also be licensed as journeymen plumbers by the city or village nearest the construction site.

Laws 1969, c. 100, § 3, p. 475;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 141.